Idaho statutes. Title 66 STATE CHARITABLE INSTITUTIONS
Chapter 5
STATE ASYLUM AND SANITARIUM FUND FOR PATIENTS

Sec.

§ 66-501. Creation of patients’ trust fund.

There shall be established in the respective offices of the superintendents or managers of each state hospital and the southwest Idaho treatment center, a fund to be known as the patients’ trust fund.

§ 66-502. Use of money in fund by patients.

Persons having money in the patient’s trust fund may, with the consent of the superintendent or attending physician, or the superintendent or attending physician on behalf of any patient may, pursuant to rules and regulations of the board of health and welfare, apply such funds for necessary, incidental expenses.

§ 66-503. Custody of money — Duty of superintendent or manager.

All moneys so held in trust shall be kept by the superintendent or manager, subject to be returned to the person or persons from whom any part of such fund has been taken for deposit in trust, except any portion thereof applied to such patient’s expenses while in said state hospital or the southwest Idaho treatment center or applied to the payment of the funeral expenses of said patient, upon his death, release or discharge from the said institution; provided however, that if any patient who dies or has been discharged or escaped from any state hospital or the southwest Idaho treatment center does not present, personally or through his legal guardian, heirs or assigns, a claim against the said trust fund for repayment to him of money to his credit in said trust fund for patients within five (5) years from the date of his death, discharge or escape as certified to the state controller of the state of Idaho by the officer in charge of said institutions, then the superintendent or manager shall pay over the money in the manner set forth in section 14-519, Idaho Code, provided however, that money held in trust for a deceased patient shall be transferred pursuant to section 14-113, Idaho Code.